Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-209] Lapse or termination for
nonpayment of premium. No individual long-term care policy or certificate
shall lapse or be terminated for nonpayment of premium unless the insurer, at
least thirty days before the effective date of the lapse or termination, has
given notice to the insured and to those persons designated in section
431:10H-208 at the address provided by the insured for purposes of receiving
notice of lapse or termination. Notice shall be given by first class United
States mail, postage prepaid and notice may not be given until thirty days
after a premium is unpaid. Notice shall be deemed to have been given as of
five days after the date of mailing. [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next